Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB29.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Fair Chance for Employment Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual pursuing employment with an employer or with or through an employment agency."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employer." Any of the following:(1) The Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718 (2) A political subdivision.(3) An instrumentality of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision.(4) A person or private entity that employs five or more employees in the current or preceding calendar year and an agent of the person or entity."Employment." An occupation or vocation."Employment agency." A person or entity, or an agent thereof, regularly undertaking with or without compensation the procurement of employees for an employer or to procure opportunities for individuals to work for an employer."Unemployment status." An individual's current or recent unemployment.Section 3. Prohibition.(a) Prohibition.--An employer or employment agency may not use an applicant's unemployment status as a factor to consider with regard to the hiring or compensation level of an applicant.(b) Exception.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an employer or employment agency from posting a job announcement that provides qualifications for a job opening, including:(1) Holding a current and valid professional or occupational license, certificate, registration, permit or other credential.(2) A minimum level of education or training or professional, occupational or field experience.Section 4. Enforcement.(a) Penalty.--The department, after reasonable investigation, may assess a penalty not to exceed $500 for a violation of section 3.20250SB0029PN0011 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Procedure.--An action or adjudication of the department under this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0029PN0011 - 3 - 1234567